Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3505
Approved surgical first assistant education program, defined.

Approved surgical first assistant education program means a program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs or the Accrediting Bureau of Health Education Schools or other accreditation entity approved by the board.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 5.